Hawaii statutes.
§342D-81 Declaration of policy. The
State's policy is to promote water pollution prevention and control, including
the use of recycled water, by financing eligible projects of eligible parties
consistent with applicable federal and state laws. The State intends the
financing to occur through a revolving fund loan program that makes loans to
eligible parties at or below market rates and a leveraging program that uses
revenue bonds and revolving fund loan programs together in a coordinated manner
that does not cause the state debt ceiling to be exceeded. [L 1997, c 221, pt
of §1; am L 2001, c 269, §5; am L 2002, c 132, §4]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next